Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 2. Financial and Administrative Standards, Authority, and Incentives.

§ 23.1-1001.
Financial and administrative management standards for public institutions of higher education.

Each public institution of higher education shall meet the following financial and administrative management standards:

An unqualified opinion from the Auditor of Public Accounts upon the audit of the public institution’s financial statements;

No significant audit deficiencies attested to by the Auditor of Public Accounts;

Substantial compliance with all financial reporting standards approved by the State Comptroller;

Substantial attainment of accounts receivable standards approved by the State Comptroller, including any standards for outstanding receivables and bad debts;

Substantial attainment of accounts payable standards approved by the State Comptroller including any standards for accounts payable past due; and

Other financial and administrative management standards established by the Governor or included in the general appropriation act currently in effect.

Each public institution of higher education that does not meet all of the financial management standards in subsection A according to the written certification of the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to § 30-133.1 shall develop and implement a written plan of corrective action to meet such standards as soon as practicable. The chairman or rector of the governing board of the public institution of higher education shall promptly provide a copy of the completed written plan to the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Secretaries of Education, Finance, and Administration.

Each public institution of higher education that does not meet all of the administrative management standards established by the Governor and such standards currently in effect for such institutions according to the written certification of the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to § 30-133.1 shall develop and implement a written plan of corrective action to meet such standards as soon as practical. The chairman or rector of the governing board of the public institution of higher education shall promptly provide a copy of the completed written plan to the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Secretaries of Education, Finance, and Administration.

History.

2016, c. 588.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2016.

§ 23.1-1002.
Eligibility for restructured financial and administrative operational authority and financial benefits.

The state goals for each public institution of higher education are to:

Consistent with its institutional mission, provide access to higher education for all citizens throughout the Commonwealth, including underrepresented populations, and consistent with subdivision 4 of §

23.1-203

and in accordance with anticipated demand analysis, meet enrollment projections and degree estimates as agreed upon with the Council. Each such institution shall bear a measure of responsibility for ensuring that the statewide demand for enrollment is met;

Consistent with §

23.1-306

, ensure that higher education remains affordable, regardless of individual or family income, and through a periodic assessment determine the impact of tuition and fee levels net of financial aid on applications, enrollment, and student indebtedness incurred for the payment of tuition, mandatory fees, and other necessary charges;

Offer a broad range of undergraduate and, where appropriate, graduate programs consistent with its mission and assess regularly the extent to which the institution’s curricula and degree programs address the Commonwealth’s need for sufficient graduates in particular shortage areas, including specific academic disciplines, professions, and geographic regions;

Ensure that the institution’s academic programs and course offerings maintain high academic standards by undertaking a continuous review and improvement of academic programs, course availability, faculty productivity, and other relevant factors;

Improve student retention so that students progress from initial enrollment to a timely graduation and the number of degrees conferred increases as enrollment increases;

Consistent with its institutional mission, develop articulation agreements that have uniform application to all comprehensive community colleges and meet appropriate general education and program requirements at the baccalaureate institution of higher education, provide additional opportunities for associate degree graduates to be admitted and enrolled, and offer dual enrollment programs in cooperation with high schools;

Actively contribute to efforts to stimulate the economic development of the Commonwealth and the area in which the institution is located, and for those institutions subject to a management agreement pursuant to Article 4 (§

23.1-1004

et seq.), in areas with below-state average income levels and employment rates;

Consistent with its institutional mission, increase the level of externally funded research conducted at the institution and facilitate the transfer of technology from university research centers to private sector companies;

Work actively and cooperatively with public elementary and secondary school administrators, teachers, and students to improve student achievement, upgrade the knowledge and skills of teachers, and strengthen leadership skills of school administrators;

Prepare a six-year financial plan consistent with §

23.1-306

;

Conduct the institution’s business affairs in a manner that (i) helps maximize the operational efficiencies and economies of the institution and the Commonwealth and (ii) meets all financial and administrative management standards pursuant to §

23.1-1001

specified by the Governor and included in the current general appropriation act, which shall include best practices for electronic procurement and leveraged purchasing, information technology, real estate portfolio management, and diversity of suppliers through fair and reasonable consideration of small, women-owned, and minority-owned business enterprises; and

Seek to ensure the safety and security of students on campus.

Each public institution of higher education that meets the state goals set forth in subsection A on or after August 1, 2005, may:

Dispose of its surplus materials at the location where the surplus materials are held and retain any proceeds from such disposal as provided in subdivision B 14 of §

2.2-1124

;

As provided in and pursuant to the conditions in subsection C of §

2.2-1132

, contract with a building official of the locality in which construction is taking place and for such official to perform any inspection and certifications required to comply with the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) pursuant to subsection C of §

36-98.1

;

For each public institution of higher education that has in effect a signed memorandum of understanding with the Secretary of Administration regarding participation in the nongeneral fund decentralization program as set forth in the general appropriation act, as provided in subsection C of §

2.2-1132

, enter into contracts for specific construction projects without the preliminary review and approval of the Division of Engineering and Buildings of the Department of General Services, provided that such institutions are in compliance with the requirements of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) and utilize the general terms and conditions for those forms of procurement approved by the Division of Engineering and Buildings and the Office of the Attorney General;

Acquire easements as provided in subdivision 4 of §

2.2-1149

;

Enter into an operating/income lease or capital lease pursuant to the conditions and provisions in subdivision 5 of §

2.2-1149

;

Convey an easement pertaining to any property such institution owns or controls as provided in subsection C of §

2.2-1150

;

In accordance with the conditions and provisions in subdivision C 2 of §

2.2-1153

, sell surplus real property that is possessed and controlled by the institution and valued at less than $5 million;

For purposes of compliance with §

2.2-4310

, procure goods, services, and construction from a vendor that the institution has certified as a small, women-owned, or minority-owned business enterprise pursuant to the conditions and provisions in §

2.2-1609

;

Be exempt from review of its budget request for information technology by the CIO as provided in subdivision B 3 of §

2.2-2007.1

;

Adopt policies for the designation of administrative and professional faculty positions at the institution pursuant to the conditions and provisions in subsection E of §

2.2-2901

;

Be exempt from reporting its purchases to the Secretary of Education, provided that all purchases, including sole source purchases, are placed through the Commonwealth’s electronic procurement system using proper system codes for the methods of procurement; and

Utilize as methods of procurement a fixed price, design-build, or construction management contract in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 43.1 (§

2.2-4378

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

Each public institution of higher education that (i) has been certified during the fiscal year by the Council pursuant to §

23.1-206

as having met the institutional performance benchmarks for public institutions of higher education and (ii) meets the state goals set in subsection A shall receive the following financial benefits:

Interest on the tuition and fees and other nongeneral fund Educational and General Revenues deposited into the state treasury by the institution, as provided in the general appropriation act. Such interest shall be paid from the general fund and shall be an appropriate and equitable amount as determined and certified in writing by the Secretary of Finance to the Comptroller by the end of each fiscal year or as soon as practicable after the end of such fiscal year;

Any unexpended appropriations of the public institution of higher education at the end of the fiscal year, which shall be reappropriated and allotted for expenditure by the institution in the immediately following fiscal year;

A pro rata amount of the rebate due to the Commonwealth on credit card purchases of $5,000 or less made during the fiscal year. The amount to be paid to each institution shall equal a pro rata share based upon its total transactions of $5,000 or less using the credit card that is approved for use by all state agencies as compared to all transactions of $5,000 or less using such card by all state agencies. The Comptroller shall determine the public institution’s pro rata share and, as provided in the general appropriation act, shall pay the institution by August 15 of the fiscal year immediately following the year of certification or as soon as practicable after August 15 of such fiscal year. The payment to an institution of its pro rata share under this subdivision shall also be applicable to other rebate or refund programs in effect that are similar to that of the credit card rebate program described in this subdivision. The Secretary of Finance shall identify such other rebate or refund programs and shall determine the pro rata share to be paid to the institution; and

A rebate of any transaction fees for the prior fiscal year paid for sole source procurements made by the institution in accordance with subsection E of §

2.2-4303

for using a vendor that is not registered with the Department of General Services’ web-based electronic procurement program commonly known as “eVA,” as provided in the general appropriation act. Such rebate shall be certified by the Department of General Services and paid to each public institution by August 15 of the fiscal year immediately following the year of certification or as soon as practicable after August 15 of such fiscal year.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.88; 2006, c. 775; 2009, cc. 827, 845; 2011, cc. 828, 869; 2013, c. 482; 2014, c. 628; 2016, cc. 296, 588; 2017, cc. 699, 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 296 amended former § 23-38.88, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 enactment by c. 296 has been given effect in this section by substituting “B 3 of
§

2.2-2007.1

” for “A 4 of
§

2.2-2007

” in subdivision B 9.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 699 and 704 are identical, and substituted “in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 43.1 (§

2.2-4378

et seq.) of Title 2.2” for “notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-4306

” in subdivision B 12.